Massachusetts, session 194th, H4172.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Notwithstanding chapter 132B of the General Laws or any other general or
special law to the contrary, the town of Provincetown may regulate through local bylaw or board
of health regulation the use or sale of second generation anti-coagulant rodenticides within the
town of Provincetown, including prohibiting the use of such pesticides by licensed commercial
applicators as defined in 333C.M.R.10.00.
SECTION 2.This act shall take effect upon its passage.
; or to take any other action relative thereto.
of 1